Utah statutes.
9-10-105.   Powers.
(1)  The board may:
(a)  appoint a hearing examiner or administrative law judge with authority to
conduct any hearings, make determinations, and enter appropriate findings of
facts, conclusions of law, and orders under authority of the Interlocal
Cooperation Act; and
(b)  make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, if necessary to perform its responsibilities.
(2)  The board shall:
(a)  be subject to the procedures and requirements under Title 52, Chapter 4,
Open and Public Meetings Act; and
(b)  be subject to the procedures and requirements under Title 51, Chapter 7,
State Money Management Act.
